Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.050

Foreign statutes as evidence.

Printed copies of the statute laws of any state, territory, foreign government, or federally recognized Indian tribe[,] if purporting to have been published under the authority of the respective governments, or if commonly admitted and read as evidence in their courts, must be admitted in all courts in this state, and on all other occasions as presumptive evidence of such laws.

[ 2019 c 39 s 3; Code 1881 s 435; 1877 p 95 s 437; 1869 p 116 s 431; 1854 p 196 s 339; RRS s 1259.]

NOTES:

Uniform judicial notice of foreign laws act: Chapter 5.24 RCW.